Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 26 School for the Deaf
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-26-1.
Name of school.

The name of the institution previously existing under the provisions of this chapter as the Rhode Island Institute for the Deaf is changed to Rhode Island School for the Deaf, and shall be known as Rhode Island School for the Deaf. Where the words “Rhode Island Institute for the Deaf” occur in any general law, public law, or resolution of the general assembly, or are used in any document, record, instrument, or proceeding authorized by any law or resolution relating to the Rhode Island Institute for the Deaf, these words shall be construed to mean the Rhode Island School for the Deaf.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 757, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-26-1

.

16-26-2.
Control by board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

The state board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall have supervision, administration, and control of the school for the deaf.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

16-26-2

.

16-26-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 85; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 2A; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 14; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 274, § 2. The repeal by chapter 103 is effective June 24, 1999, and the repeal by chapter 274 is effective July 2, 1999. For present similar provisions, see §

16-26-3.1

.

16-26-3.1.
Board of Trustees.

The powers delegated and authorized in this chapter for the board of regents for elementary and secondary education and the department of elementary and secondary education shall be in addition to those previously authorized by any other general or public law.

The governance, funding, and programming of the Rhode Island School for the Deaf shall be in accordance with the rules and regulations formulated by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

The purpose of this chapter is to restructure the governance of the Rhode Island School for the Deaf.

The School for the Deaf shall be operated as a local education agency and shall be governed by a board of trustees. With the exception of those powers and duties reserved to the director, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, the board of trustees shall have the powers and duties of a school committee.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall appoint the members of the board of trustees from nominations made by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The chairperson shall also be selected in this manner. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall determine the qualifications and terms of office of members of the board of trustees. The board of trustees shall be comprised of nine (9) individuals, not less than five (5) of whom shall be persons who are deaf and hard of hearing. The commissioner may seek input on nominations of persons who are deaf and hard of hearing from organizations whose membership is primarily made up of deaf and hard of hearing individuals, individuals who are deaf and hard of hearing, or organizations whose purpose is advocacy for individuals who are deaf and hard of hearing, as well as from other sources. For purposes of obtaining input from diverse sources regarding suggestions for nominations for the first trustees to be nominated by the commissioner, the commissioner shall convene a public quorum to obtain broad input prior to making the initial nominations for the founding membership on the board of trustees. No person in any way employed by or doing business with the Rhode Island School for the Deaf shall serve on the board of trustees.

The board of regents shall establish strategic directions for the education of deaf and hard of hearing children in the state of Rhode Island.

The board of regents shall provide parameters for budget requests, recommend a budget, and participate in budget development.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall recommend parameters for the overall budget requests, recommend a budget, and participate in budget development.

The commissioner shall approve the process for selection of a director of the school.

The board of trustees shall meet monthly and serve without compensation. Seven (7) members of the board of trustees shall be required to attend teacher appeal meetings pursuant to §

16-13-4

. The board of trustees shall have broad policy making authority of the operation of the school consistent with this subsection and the following powers and duties:

To identify the needs of deaf and hard of hearing children in the state of Rhode Island.

To develop educational policies to meet the needs of deaf and hard of hearing children served by the school for the deaf.

To appoint a director of the school to serve as its chief executive officer and to approve assistant directors from nominations made by the director.

To provide policy guidance and participate in budget development.

To develop staffing policies which ensure that all students are taught by educators of the highest possible quality.

The director shall serve at the pleasure of the board of trustees with the initial appointment to be for a period of not more than five (5) years; provided, that the term and conditions of employment are subject to the approval of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

It is the responsibility of the director to manage and operate the school on a day to day basis. The director’s responsibilities shall include the following:

To be responsible for the entire care, supervision, and management of the school for the deaf.

To recommend to the board of regents educational policies to meet the needs of the deaf and hard of hearing children and to implement policies established by the board of trustees.

To present nominations to the board of trustees for assistant administrators and to appoint all other school personnel.

To provide for the evaluation of all school personnel.

To establish a school based management approach for decision making for the operation of the school.

To report to the board of trustees on a regular basis the financial condition and the operation of the school, and to report annually on the educational progress of the school.

To establish appropriate advisory committees as needed to provide guidance and feedback on the operation of the school.

To make himself or herself available to the board of trustees and to attend board of trustees meetings to provide a link between the school and the board of trustees.

With policy guidance from the board of trustees and extensive involvement of the administrators and faculty of the school, the director shall annually prepare a budget. The board of trustees will approve the budget and transmit it to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall provide parameters for the overall budget request. Based on review and recommendations for the commissioner, the board of regents shall approve the total budget and incorporate it into its budget request to the governor and to the general assembly. Line item budgeting decisions shall be the responsibility of the director.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to bargain collectively pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28 or to allow the board of trustees or the director to abrogate any agreement by collective bargaining. Employees at the Rhode Island School for the Deaf shall continue to be state employees and the bargaining units which are presently established at the school shall remain intact.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 103, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 274, § 3.

16-26-4, 16-26-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 86, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 101, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 113, § 4; P.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; P.L. 1969, ch. 128, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 274, § 2. The repeal by chapter 103 is effective June 24, 1999, and the repeal by chapter 274 is effective July 2, 1999. For present similar provisions, see §

16-26-3.1

.

16-26-6.
Admission of students.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may admit any persons in the Rhode Island School for the Deaf as provided in §

16-26-7

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 86, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 101, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 113, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-26-6

.

16-26-7.
Persons admissible.

All children of parents, or under the control of guardians or other persons, legal residents of this state, between the ages from birth to twenty-one (21) years, whose hearing or speech, or both, are impaired as to make it impracticable for this student to make progress toward his or her educational goals by attending the public schools may attend the Rhode Island School for the Deaf, without charge, under any rules and regulations as the board of regents for elementary and secondary education may establish.

Deaf persons from birth to twenty-one (21) years, who are legal residents of the state, shall be entitled to the privilege of the school without charge, and for any period of time in each individual case as may be deemed appropriate by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education; residents of other states may be admitted upon the payment of any rates of board and tuition as may be fixed by the board.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 86, § 4; P.L. 1896, ch. 332, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 101, §§ 4, 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 113, §§ 4, 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-26-7

; P.L. 1999, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 274, § 1.

16-26-7.1.
Regional hearing impaired programs.

Each city and town may contract with the Rhode Island School for the Deaf to establish and operate programs for the hearing impaired.

When these programs are operated by the Rhode Island School for the Deaf, each participating city or town shall be assessed for the cost of the program in the proportion that their enrollment bears to the total enrollment in the program. The assessments shall be deposited in a restricted receipt account for the purpose of funding expenditures necessary to operate the regional program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 274, § 1.

16-26-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 332, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1205; G.L. 1909, ch. 101, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 113, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 274, § 2. The repeal by chapter 103 is effective June 24, 1999, and the repeal by chapter 274 is effective July 2, 1999.

16-26-9.
Certificates of proficiency.

Any child having attended the school for a time or course prescribed by the board, upon leaving the school, shall be entitled to receive a certificate of his or her proficiency from the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 332, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 101, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 113, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-26-9

.

16-26-10.
Annual report to general assembly.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall annually in the month of January make a report to the general assembly of the state and condition of the school, and a statement of all expenses incurred for salaries, maintenance, tuition, and other items of current expense, together with an estimate of the amount of money necessary to meet the current expenses of the next year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 86, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 101, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 113, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-26-10

.

16-26-11.
Execution of chapter — Rules and regulations.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall carry out the provisions of this chapter and shall make any rules and regulations governing the operation of the school that may be required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 85; G.L. 1938, ch. 187, § 8; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

16-26-11

.

16-26-12.
Other sources of funding.

The 2009 general assembly, through the FY 2010 appropriation act, established a fee for a service program, also known as a tuition program, for the Rhode Island school for the deaf effective July 1, 2009 in accordance with the fee structure developed and implemented by the department of elementary and secondary education. Under this fee for service program, and the provisions of Rhode Island general law §

16-26-7.1

notwithstanding, districts shall be assessed tuition to cover the costs of educational services that are additional to the core deaf and hard-of-hearing education program that is provided to resident students at the Rhode Island school for the deaf.

Tuition assessed at the school for the deaf to cover costs of educational services that are additional to the core deaf and hard-of-hearing education program shall be based on a graduated tuition schedule correlating to the varying needs of students. Districts shall receive three (3) times each school year, invoices summarizing the basis for the tuition charged. There shall be deducted from the final aid payment to each school district at the end of the fiscal year any amounts owed to the state for these additional educational services. All tuition paid by districts and any aid deducted for non-payment shall be deposited in a restricted receipt account and shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of §

35-4-7

.

The school for the deaf is hereby authorized to rent or lease space in its school building. The school shall deposit any revenues from such agreements into a restricted receipt account, to be known as the school for the deaf rental income account, to be used for the same educational purposes that its state appropriation is used. Any such rental agreements must receive prior approval from the school’s board of trustees and by the state properties committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 10, § 5.